Hawaii, session 2026, SB3007.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that culture, arts, and history are essential pillars of Hawaii's identity and are vital to building vibrant, resilient, and connected communities. The State has long supported these efforts through the state foundation on culture and the arts, which plays an important role in promoting the arts and expanding access for residents statewide. The legislature further finds that jurisdictions around the world have advanced innovative, place-based strategies that integrate culture, arts, and history into planning, infrastructure, and community development, resulting in stronger public spaces, increased economic activity, and more dynamic and inclusive communities. The legislature also finds that Hawaii can build upon its existing foundation by expanding its capacity to support creative community development, foster cross-sector collaboration, and advance projects that meaningfully integrate culture and the arts into the fabric of everyday life. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish the office of community culture, arts, and innovation as a sister entity to the state foundation on culture and the arts to broaden and strengthen the State's creative portfolio. The office shall identify and advance best practices; support state agencies and community partners in implementing innovative, place-based strategies; and prioritize projects that enhance public spaces, strengthen community connections, and improve quality of life across the State. The office shall also establish a community and cultural partnership program to serve as a resource for communities statewide.  The program shall support efforts that preserve and elevate cultural and historical assets, stimulate social and economic activity, and catalyze positive, community-driven change, with projects serving as scalable models for replication in other communities, as appropriate. SECTION 2.  Chapter 201, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part .  Office of Community Culture, ARTS, and Innovation §201-A  Definitions. As used in this part: "Executive director" means the executive director of the office of community culture, arts, and innovation, appointed pursuant to section 201‑B(b). "Office" means the office of community culture, arts, and innovation established pursuant to section 201-B. §201-B  Office of community culture, arts, and innovation; established; executive director.  (a) There is established an office of community culture, arts, and innovation within the department of business, economic development, and tourism for administrative purposes only. (b)  The office shall be headed by an executive director who shall be appointed by the governor without regard to chapter 76.  Notwithstanding section 76-16(b)(17), the exemption from chapter 76 under this subsection shall not expire. (c)  The executive director may employ staff for the office without regard to chapters 76 and 89; provided that the staff shall be members of the employees' retirement system and shall be eligible to receive the benefits of any employee benefit program generally applicable to officers and employees of the State. Notwithstanding section 76-16(b)(17), the exemption from chapter 76 under this subsection shall not expire. (d)  Department heads may temporarily assign additional employees from existing positions within their departments to the office; provided that the employees shall represent their respective department's needs, assist other departments, or otherwise support the needs of the office during the course of their assignment with the office. (e) The office may provide grants and contract for the provision of programs and services to perform its functions and duties pursuant to section 201-C. §201-C  Office of community culture, arts, and innovation; functions and duties. The office shall: (1)  Execute projects and programs related to community improvement as directed by the governor and legislature; (2)  Support and assist other state departments and agencies with creative and innovative improvements to their projects, programs, and endeavors to add value to communities; (3)  Develop creative and innovative projects, programs, and endeavors and pilot new approaches to add value to communities, their culture, and quality of life; (4)  Identify creative and innovative best practices used by other jurisdictions, assess their value to the State, and innovate accordingly; (5)  Ensure communication with the state foundation on culture and the arts regarding the office's functions and duties for consistency and better planning for the State; and (6)  Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 for the purposes of this part. §201-D  Annual report.  The office shall submit an annual report summarizing its activities during the preceding year to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session.  The report shall include: (1)  Creative and innovative strategies proposed or employed by other jurisdictions that the office has identified that may have potential benefit for communities in the State; (2)  Funds received and expended for the activities of the office from federal, state, private, and philanthropic sources; (3)  The office's programs and activities throughout the year; (4)  Plans and direction for the coming year; and (5)  Any other findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation. §201-E  Community and cultural partnership program; established.  (a)  In addition to other duties, the office shall establish a community and cultural partnership program focused on improving communities.  The program shall serve as a community resource to enhance historical culture, stimulate social and economic activity, create positive change in the community, and serve as a template for improvements in other communities, as may be appropriate. (b) The office may contract with one or more entities to administer the community and cultural partnership program and complete the actions required by subsection (c). (c) The program shall endeavor to: (1)  Identify and organize community stakeholders and other community-based organizations that may contribute to the community and cultural partnership program; (2)  Engage the community to develop improvements that exhibit the area's history from its origins to the present day; (3)  Assess the physical, social, and economic conditions of properties and infrastructure in the area; (4)  Coordinate with stakeholders to provide for preservation, adaptive reuse, and mixed-use diversity and assist with design and permitting information to help property owners, business owners, and developers who are considering property improvements to best reflect the cultural narrative and historical context of the area; (5)  Organize culture and arts and improvement projects to improve and expand public spaces and enhance streets, infrastructure, facades, and vacant storefronts; (6)  Organize community culture and arts events, including the closures of streets for events and multi-use purposes that can enhance community life by providing safe and inclusive opportunities for recreation, active transportation, and cultural engagement; (7)  Help facilitate the establishment of a business improvement district, or similar organization, and related community services; (8)  Seek additional funding to improve the community and help enhance a geographically defined area that actively preserves, showcases, and evolves the cultural, historical, and artistic identity of a community through ongoing cultural practices, local businesses, public spaces, and programming, in a manner that is community-driven, supports economic vitality, and provides authentic, place-based experiences for residents and visitors; (9)  Draft a statewide strategic economic and physical revitalization design implementation plan with proposed projects, starting with the Honolulu Chinatown area; (10)  Work with appropriate agencies and stakeholders to better design and integrate active, safe, and protected multi-modal pedestrian, bicycle, and public transit through the area, including to any nearby transit hubs or rail stations; and (11)  Identify and develop other innovative projects, programming, or improvements to enhance the community." SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $300,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of the office of community culture, arts, and innovation, including for the following purposes: (1)  The establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) executive director position; (2)  The establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) specialist position; and (3)  Other expenses for the purposes of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. In codifying the new sections added by section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.